District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-6016

Proceedings involving insolvent insurers; reopening default judgments

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 17, 40 DCR 6120

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-1901 to 35-1917.